Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1208
Rules and regulations; right of appeal and hearings.

Authority to adopt rules and regulations and the right to appeal and hearing shall be the same in the program of social services as in the program of assistance to families and children and the aged, blind, or disabled.

Laws 1973, LB 511, § 8.